District of Columbia statutes.
21-2402.05

Exclusive and continuing jurisdiction.

Except as otherwise provided in § 21-2402.04, a court that has appointed a guardian or issued a protective order consistent with this chapter has exclusive and continuing jurisdiction over the proceeding until it is terminated by the court or the appointment or order expires by its own terms.

History

Nov. 25, 2008, D.C. Law 17-270, § 2(b), 55 DCR 11018

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 205 of the Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act.